Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 2 State Purchases

37-2-1.
Purchasing agent — Appointment — Duties.

Within the department of administration there shall be a purchasing agent who shall be appointed by the chief purchasing officer with the approval of the governor, and who shall now and hereafter be in the classified service of the state. The purchasing agent shall exercise the powers and duties as set forth in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2.

37-2-2.
General provisions.

This chapter shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes and policies.

The underlying purposes and policies of this chapter are to:

Simplify, clarify, and modernize the law governing purchasing by the state of Rhode Island and its local public agencies;

Permit the continued development of purchasing policies and practices;

Make as consistent as possible the purchasing laws among the various states;

Provide for increased public confidence in the procedures followed in public procurement;

Insure the fair and equitable treatment of all persons who deal with the procurement system of the state;

Provide increased economy in state and public agency procurement activities by fostering effective competition;

Provide safeguards for the maintenance of a procurement system of quality, integrity and highest ethical standards; and

Ensure that a public agency, acting through its existing internal purchasing function, adheres to the general principles, policies and practices enumerated herein.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2.

37-2-3.
Supplemental general principles of law — Obligation of good faith.

Unless displaced by the particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity, including the Uniform Commercial Code, Title 6A, the law merchant, and the law of contracts, including, but not limited to, agency, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, and bankruptcy, shall supplement these provisions.

Every contract or duty under this chapter shall impose upon both parts the obligation of good faith in its performance and/or enforcement. “Good faith” shall mean honesty in fact in the conduct or transaction concerned and the observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2.

37-2-4.
Applicability.

This chapter shall apply to every expenditure of public funds by any state governmental entity except as otherwise provided by law, by this state, or a public agency under any contract or like business agreement, excepting only those contracts or like business agreements where the state purchases goods or services from its political subdivisions or other governmental entities. It shall also apply to the disposal of state supplies. Nothing in this chapter or in the regulations promulgated hereunder shall prevent any state governmental entity from complying with the terms and conditions of any grant, gift, bequest, or cooperative agreement except where such terms and conditions may conflict with requirements of law, including, but not limited to, the provisions of this chapter regarding competitive procurement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 367, § 1.

37-2-5.
Severability — Construction against implicit repealer.

If any provision of this chapter or application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

Since this chapter is a general act intended to provide model coverage of its subject matter, no part of it shall be deemed to be impliedly repealed by subsequent legislation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2.

37-2-6.
Determinations.

Every determination required by this chapter shall be in writing and based upon written findings of fact by the public official making the determination. These determinations and written findings shall be retained in an official contract file in the office of the chief purchasing office, the using agency, or public agency administering the contract.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2.

37-2-7.
Definitions.

The words defined in this section have the meanings set forth below whenever they appear in this chapter, unless the context in which they are used clearly requires a different meaning or a different definition is prescribed for a particular section, group of sections, or provision:

“Business” means any corporation, partnership, individual, sole proprietorship, joint stock company, joint venture, or any other legal entity through which business is conducted.

“Change order” means a written authorization signed by the purchasing agent directing or allowing the contractor to proceed with changes, alterations, or modifications to the terms, conditions, or scope of work on a previously awarded contract.

“Chief purchasing officer” shall mean: (i) For a state agency, the director of the department of administration, and (ii) For a public agency, the executive director or the chief operational officer of the agency.

“Construction” means the process of building, altering, repairing, improving, or demolishing any public structures or building, or other public improvements of any kind to any public real property. It does not include the routine maintenance or repair of existing structures, buildings, or real property performed by salaried employees of the state of Rhode Island in the usual course of their jobs.

“Contract” means all types of agreements, including grants and orders, for the purchase or disposal of supplies, services, construction, or any other item. It includes awards; contracts of a fixed-price, cost, cost-plus-a-fixed-fee, or incentive type; contracts providing for the issuance of job or task orders; leases; letter contracts; purchase orders; and construction management contracts. It also includes supplemental agreements with respect to any of the foregoing. “Contract” does not include labor contracts with employees of state agencies.

“Contract amendment” means any written alteration in the specifications, delivery point, rate of delivery, contract period, price, quantity, or other contract provisions of any existing contract, whether accomplished by unilateral action in accordance with a contract provision, or by mutual action of the parties to the contract. It includes bilateral actions, such as supplemental agreements, and unilateral actions, such as change orders, administrative changes, notices of termination, and notices of the exercise of a contract option.

“Contractor” means any person having a contract with a governmental body.

“Data” means recorded information, regardless of form or characteristic.

“Designee” means a duly authorized representative of a person holding a superior position.

“Employee” means an individual drawing a salary from a state governmental entity.

“State governmental entity” means any entity created as a legislative body or a public or state agency by the general assembly or constitution of this state, except for municipal, regional, or county governmental entities.

“May” means permissive.

“Negotiation” means contracting by either the method set forth in §

37-2-19

,

37-2-20

, or

37-2-21

.

“Person” means any business, individual, organization, or group of individuals.

“Procurement” means the purchasing, buying, renting, leasing, or otherwise obtaining of any supplies, services, or construction. It also includes all functions that pertain to the obtaining of any supply, service, or construction item, including a description of requirements, selection and solicitation of sources, preparation, and award of contract, and all phases of contract administration.

“Public agency” shall mean the Rhode Island industrial recreational building authority, the Rhode Island commerce corporation, the Rhode Island industrial facilities corporation, the Rhode Island refunding bond authority, the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation, the Rhode Island resource recovery corporation, the Rhode Island public transit authority, the Rhode Island student loan authority, the Howard development corporation, the water resources board corporate, the Rhode Island health and education building corporation, the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority, the Blackstone Valley district commission, the Narragansett Bay water quality management district commission, the Rhode Island telecommunications authority, the convention center authority, the Channel 36 foundation, the Rhode Island lottery commission their successors and assigns, any other body corporate and politic which has been or will be created or established within this state excepting cities and towns, the university of Rhode Island board of trustees for all purchases that are funded by restricted, sponsored, or auxiliary monies, and the council on postsecondary education for all purchases that are funded by restricted, sponsored, or auxiliary monies.

“Purchase request” or “purchase requisition” means that document whereby a using agency requests that a contract be entered into to obtain goods and/or services for a specified need, and may include, but is not limited to, the technical description of the requested item, delivery requirements, transportation mode request, criteria for evaluation of proposals, and/or preparation of suggested sources of supply, and information supplied for the making of any written determination and finding required by §

37-2-6

.

“Purchasing agency” means any state governmental entity which is authorized by this chapter, its implementing regulations, or by way of delegation from the chief purchasing officer to contract on its own behalf rather than through the central contracting authority of the chief purchasing officer.

“Purchasing agent” means any person authorized by a governmental entity in accordance with procedures prescribed by regulations, to enter into and administer contracts and make written determinations and findings with respect to contracts. The term also includes an authorized representative acting within the limits of authority. “Purchasing agent” also means the person appointed in accordance with §

37-2-1

.

“Services” means the rendering, by a contractor, of its time and effort rather than the furnishing of a specific end product, other than reports that are merely incidental to the required performance of services. “Services” does not include labor contracts with employees of state agencies.

“Shall” means imperative.

“State” means the state of Rhode Island and any of its departments or agencies and public agencies.

“Supplemental agreement” means any contract modification which is accomplished by the mutual action of the parties.

“Supplies” means all property, including, but not limited to, leases of real property, printing, and insurance, except land or permanent interest in land.

“Using agency” means any state governmental entity which utilizes any supplies, services, or construction purchased under this chapter.

As used in §

37-2-59

, “architect” or “engineer” services means those professional services within the scope of practice of architecture, professional engineering, or registered land surveying pertaining to construction, as defined by the laws of this state. “Consultant” means any person with whom the state and/or a public agency has a contract which contract provides for the person to give direction or information as regards a particular area of knowledge in which the person is a specialist and/or has expertise.

For purposes of §§

37-2-62

—

37-2-70

, “directors” means those members of a public agency appointed pursuant to a statute who comprise the governing authority of the board, commission, authority, and/or corporation.

“State agency” means any department, commission, council, board, bureau, committee, institution, or other governmental entity of the executive or judicial branch of this state not otherwise established as a body corporate and politic, and includes, without limitation, the council on postsecondary education except for purchases which are funded by restricted, sponsored, or auxiliary moneys, the university of Rhode Island board of trustees except for all purchases which are funded by restricted, sponsored, or auxiliary monies, and the council on elementary and secondary education.

“Governmental entity” means any department, commission, council, board, bureau, committee, institution, legislative body, agency, or government corporation of the executive, legislative, or judicial branches of state, federal, and/or local governments.

“Construction management at-risk” or “construction management at-risk services” or “construction management at-risk delivery method” is a construction method wherein a construction manager at-risk provides a range of preconstruction services and construction management services which may include cost estimation and consultation regarding the design of the building project, the preparation and coordination of bid packages, scheduling, cost control, and value engineering, acting as the general contractor during the construction, detailing the trade contractor scope of work, holding the trade contracts and other contracts, evaluating trade contractors and subcontractors, and providing management and construction services, all at a guaranteed maximum price, which shall represent the maximum amount to be paid by the using agency for the building project, including the cost of work, the general conditions, and the fee payable to the construction management at-risk firm.

“Construction manager at-risk” or “construction management at-risk firm” is a person or business experienced in construction that has the ability to evaluate and to implement drawings and specifications as they affect time, cost and quality of construction and the ability to coordinate and deliver the construction of the project within a guaranteed maximum price, which shall represent the maximum amount to be paid by the using agency for the building project, including the cost of the work, the general conditions, and the fee payable to the construction management at-risk firm. The construction manager at-risk provides consultation services during the preconstruction and construction phases of the project. The project engineer, architect, or owner’s program manager may not serve as the construction manager at-risk.

“Owner’s program manager” shall be an entity engaged to provide project management services on behalf of a state agency for the construction and supervision of the construction of a building project. The owner’s program manager acts as the owner’s agent in all aspects of the construction project, including, but not limited to, architectural programming, planning, design, construction, and the selection and procurement of an appropriate construction delivery method. The owner’s program manager shall have at least seven (7) years’ experience in the construction and supervision of construction of buildings of similar size and complexity. The owner’s program manager shall not have been employed during the preceding year by the design firm, the construction firm, and/or the subcontractors associated with the project.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 127, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 1, § 16; P.L. 1999, ch. 31, art. 1, § 15; P.L. 1999, ch. 367, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 1, § 15; P.L. 2000, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 1, § 15; P.L. 2008, ch. 457, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 336, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 385, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 15; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 12; P.L. 2020, ch. 13, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 18, § 1.

37-2-8.
Rhode Island foodstuffs.

When foodstuffs of good quality grown or produced in Rhode Island by Rhode Island farmers are available, the purchasing agent is directed to purchase those foodstuffs at the prevailing market prices when any of those foodstuffs are required by the state institutions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2.

37-2-9.
Authority and duties of the chief purchasing officer.

The chief purchasing officer shall have power and authority over, and may, except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, adopt regulations pursuant to §

42-35-2

and consistent with this chapter governing the purchasing, management, and control of any and all supplies, services, construction, and other items required to be purchased by the state. The chief purchasing officer shall consider and decide matters of policy with regard to state procurement. The chief purchasing officer shall have the power of review with respect to the implementation of regulations and policy determinations.

Regulations shall be adopted governing the following:

Conditions and procedures for delegations of purchasing authority;

Prequalification, suspension, debarment, and reinstatement of prospective bidders;

Small purchase procedures;

Conditions and procedures for the purchase of perishables and items for resale;

Conditions and procedures for the use of source selection methods authorized by this chapter including emergency purchases;

Opening and rejection of bids or offers, consideration of alternate bids, and waiver of informalities in offers;

Confidentiality of technical data and trade secrets information submitted by actual or prospective bidders or offerors;

Partial, progressive, and multiple awards;

Supervision of storerooms and inventories, including determination of appropriate stock levels and the management, transfer, sale, or other disposal of state owned property;

Definitions and classes of contractual services and procedures for acquiring them;

To sell, trade, or otherwise dispose of surplus supplies and services for the state;

To exercise general supervision and control over all warehouses, storerooms, stores, and all inventories of supplies, services, and construction belonging to the state;

To establish and maintain programs for the development and use of purchasing specifications, and for the inspection, testing, and acceptance of supplies, services, and construction;

To develop a program which involves and/or utilizes small business and small disadvantaged business as contractors;

To develop standards of conduct which supplement the provisions of chapter 14 of title 36, as amended, for personnel involved in the state of Rhode Island purchasing process;

For all contracts for supplies and services exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), contractors must comply with the requirements of federal executive order no. 11246, as amended, §

28-5.1-10

, and other regulations as issued by the purchasing agent, and administered by the state equal opportunity office of the department of administration. Failure to comply will be considered a substantial breach of the contract subject to penalties prescribed in the regulations.

The chief purchasing officer may adopt such other regulations as deemed advisable to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2.

37-2-9.1.
Bidder registration fee.

The chief purchasing officer may adopt regulations to establish an annual fee, of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00), which shall be paid by all potential bidders requesting to subscribe to solicitation mailings for public bids for specific types of supplies, services, and construction during a fiscal year, and may waive that fee for Rhode Island firms. Additionally, the chief purchasing agent officer may delegate to the purchasing agent the authority to waive that fee for an individual solicitation and to include unregistered bidders in the solicitation in the interest of expanding competition. Nothing herein shall prevent any interested party from submitting a bid in response to any solicitation of which they become aware.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 75, § 1.

37-2-10.
Distribution of procurement activities.

The chief purchasing officer may provide for the distribution of the department’s procurement activities and functions among the various divisions within the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2.

37-2-11.
Authority and duties of the purchasing agent.

The purchasing agent shall have the following authority and responsibilities:

To serve as the central procurement and contracting agency of the state;

To recommend regulations, rules, and procedures to the chief purchasing officer; and

To purchase or otherwise acquire, or, with the approval of the chief purchasing officer, to delegate the purchase and acquisition of all supplies, services, and construction for the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2.

37-2-12.
Centralization of the procurement authority.

All rights, powers, duties, and authority relating to the procurement of supplies, services, and construction, and the management, control, warehousing, sale, and disposal of supplies, services, and construction now vested in or exercised by any state agency under the several statutes relating thereto are hereby transferred to the chief purchasing officer as provided in this chapter, subject to the provisions of §

37-2-54

. A public agency does not have to utilize the centralized purchasing of the state but the public agency, through its existing internal purchasing function, shall adhere to the general principles, policies and practices set forth in this chapter.

The chief purchasing officer, as defined in § 37-2-7(3)(i), may establish, charge, and collect from state contractors, listed on master-price agreements, a statewide contract administrative fee not to exceed one percent (1%) of the total value of the annual spend against a contract awarded to a state contractor. All statewide contract administrative fees collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited into a restricted-receipt account within the general fund designated as the “division of purchases administrative-fee account” and shall be used for the purposes of implementing technology for the submission and processing of bids, online vendor registration, bid notification, and other costs related to state procurement. On or before January 15, 2019, and annually thereafter on or before January 15, the chief purchasing officer or designee shall file a report with the governor, the speaker of the house, and the president of the senate detailing:

The total amount of funds collected and deposited into the division of purchases administrative-fee account for the most recently completed fiscal year;

The account balance as of the date of the report;

An itemization of all expenditures and other uses of said funds from said account for the most recently completed fiscal year; and

An annual evaluation as to the appropriateness of the amount of the contract administrative fee on master-price agreements.

Subject to the approval of the director of the department of administration, the state controller is authorized to offset any currently recorded outstanding liability on the part of developmental disability organizations (DDOs) to repay previously authorized startup capital advances against the proceeds from the sale of group homes within a fiscal year prior to any sale proceeds being deposited into the information technology investment fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 367, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 7, § 11.

37-2-13.
Procurement regulations.

Within sixty (60) days after July 1, 1989, the chief purchasing officer shall promulgate the initial state purchasing regulations in accordance with current policies and procedures. The initial regulations may be promulgated on an interim basis and shall be promulgated on a final basis in accordance with chapter 35 of title 42.

All additions, deletions, or other modifications of the final purchasing regulations issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be promulgated by the chief purchasing officer in accordance with any applicable provisions of this chapter and chapter 35 of title 42.

The chief purchasing officer shall not delegate his or her power to issue the state purchasing regulations under subsections (a) and (b) of this section to any other person or agency and no state purchasing regulations shall be issued except as approved by the chief purchasing officer.

No state purchasing regulation shall change in any way a contract commitment by the state nor of a contractor to the state which was in existence on the effective date of the regulation.

The provisions of state purchasing regulations promulgated as authorized herein shall be considered to be incorporated by operation of law in all state contracts.

Contract provisions and contracts entered into in violation of regulations shall be void ab initio.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2.

37-2-13.1.
Procurement regulations — Request for proposal.

No request for proposal shall change to a master-price agreement unless the request for proposal is cancelled and reissued as a master price agreement.

No vendor, parent corporation, subsidiary, affiliate, or subcontractor of any state vendor may bid on a request for proposal if that person or entity has or had any contractual, financial, business, or beneficial interest with the state or with any official, officer, or agency in charge of the request or if they participated or were consulted with respect to the requirements, technical aspects, or any other part of the formation and promulgation of the request for proposals. Further, no person or entity who or that acts as an operator or vendor for the state may participate in any request for proposal relating to any audit, examination, independent verification, review, or evaluation of any of the person’s or entity’s work, financials or operations performed for or on behalf of the state, or any official, officer, or agency.

Persons or entities certified as “sole source” providers under §

37-2-21

shall be exempt from the requirements of subsection (b) of this section.

Any person or entity submitting a proposal in response to a request for proposal shall make a written certification attesting under the penalty of perjury that the terms of subsection (b) of this section have been complied with or that the person or entity is exempt under subsection (c) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 350, § 1, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 351, § 1, effective June 29, 2022.

37-2-14.
Relationship with user agencies.

The purchasing agent shall maintain a close and cooperative relationship with the using agencies of the state. Any using agency may at any time make recommendations concerning procurement to the purchasing agent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2.

37-2-15.
Source selection and contract formation — Statutory provisions.

As used in this chapter unless the context in which they are used clearly requires a different meaning:

“Cost-reimbursement contract” shall mean a contract under which the state reimburses the contractor for those contract costs, within a stated ceiling, which are allowable and allocable in accordance with cost principles (as provided in §

37-2-43

), and a fixed fee, if any.

“Established catalogue price” shall mean the price included in the most current catalogue, price list, schedule, or other form that:

Is regularly maintained by the manufacturer or vendor of an item;

Is either published or otherwise available for inspection by customers;

States prices at which sales are currently or were last made to a significant number of buyers constituting the general buying public for that item; and

States prices which are obtained from the most recent industry wide publications and informational journals if any.

“Evaluated bid price” shall mean the dollar amount of a bid, after bid price adjustments are made pursuant to objective measurable criteria, set forth in the invitation for bids, which affect the economy and effectiveness in the operation or use of the product, such as reliability, maintainability, useful life, and residual value.

“Invitation for bids” shall mean all documents, whether attached or incorporated by reference, utilized for soliciting bids in accordance with the procedures set forth in §§

37-2-18

and

37-2-18.1

.

“Request for proposals” shall mean all documents, whether attached or incorporated by reference, utilized for soliciting proposals in accordance with the procedures set forth in this chapter.

“Responsible bidder or offeror” shall mean a qualified bidder or offeror who has the capability in all respects, including financial responsibility, to perform fully the contract requirements, and the integrity and reliability which will assure good faith performance.

“Responsive bidder or offeror” shall mean a person who has submitted a bid or offer which conforms in all material respects to the invitation for bids or proposals, so that all bidders or offerors may stand on equal footing with respect to the method and timeliness of submission and as to the substance of any resulting contract.

“Request for qualifications” shall mean all documents, whether attached or incorporated by reference, utilized for soliciting qualifications of offerors prior to or during the solicitation of bids or proposals.

“Reverse Auction” shall mean a bid competition where the lowest responsive and responsible bidder wins the auction.

“Auctioneer” shall mean a business or organization that conducts an electronic reverse auction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 367, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 296, § 1.

37-2-16.
[Reserved.]

37-2-17.
Method of source selection.

Except for purchases solicited pursuant to the provisions for small purchases set forth in §

37-2-22

, all state contracts and purchases shall be solicited through utilization of the Rhode Island Vendor Information Program (RIVIP) as set forth in §

37-2-17.1

. Except as otherwise authorized by law, all state contracts shall be awarded by:

Competitive sealed offers, pursuant to §

37-2-18

;

Competitive negotiation, pursuant to §§

37-2-19

and

37-2-20

;

Noncompetitive negotiation, pursuant to §

37-2-21

;

Small purchase procedures, pursuant to §

37-2-22

; or

Reverse auctions, pursuant to §

37-2-18.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 137, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 279, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 367, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 296, § 1.

37-2-17.1.
Rhode Island vendor information program (RIVIP).

The chief purchasing officer is directed to institute an electronic vendor information program which shall enable all invitations for bid and requests for a proposal to be accessed electronically by all potential vendors. This program is to be readily accessible through public access stations located at the following locations:

One Capitol Hill, Providence, Rhode Island;

City hall, town hall or public library of each of the thirty-nine (39) cities and towns in the state.

Further, the vendor information program shall be accessible to potential vendors through means of computer modem.

The chief purchasing officer may contract with auctioneers as defined in §

37-2-15(10)

to conduct electronic reverse auctions, provided that notification of the opportunity to participate in the auction is posted on the RIVIP in accordance with the requirements of §

37-2-25.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 137, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 279, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 296, § 1.

37-2-17.2.
Utilization of department of administration Rhode Island vendor information program (RIVIP).

All public agencies as defined by §

37-2-7(16)

shall utilize the RIVIP established by the chief purchasing officer for state agencies (director of the department of administration) to implement the requirements of §§

37-2-17

and

37-2-17.1

. The director of administration shall be authorized to assess prorated charges to public agencies to offset costs for acquisition of equipment, computer and other development, consultant services, installation of equipment, software, communications lines, initial and ongoing training and outreach, maintenance and any other costs of implementing and operating the department of administration RIVIP.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 279, § 3.

37-2-18.
Competitive sealed bidding.

Contracts exceeding the amount provided by §

37-2-22

shall be awarded by competitive sealed bidding unless it is determined in writing that this method is not practicable or that the best value for the state may be obtained by using an electronic reverse auction as set forth in §

37-2-18.1

. Factors to be considered in determining whether competitive sealed bidding is practicable shall include whether:

Specifications can be prepared that permit award on the basis of either the lowest bid price or the lowest evaluated bid price; and

The available sources, the time and place of performance, and other relevant circumstances as are appropriate for the use of competitive sealed bidding.

The invitation for bids shall state whether the award shall be made on the basis of the lowest bid price or the lowest evaluated or responsive bid price. If the latter basis is used, the objective measurable criteria to be utilized shall be set forth in the invitation for bids, if available. All documents submitted in response to the bid proposal are public pursuant to chapter 38-2 upon opening of the bids. The invitation for bids shall state that each bidder must submit a copy of their bid proposal to be available for public inspection upon the opening of the bids. The burden to identify and withhold from the public copy that is released at the bid opening any trade secrets, commercial or financial information, or other information the bidder deems not subject to public disclosure pursuant to chapter 38-2, the Access to Public Records Act, shall rest with the bidder submitting the bid proposal.

Unless the invitations for bid are accessible under the provisions as provided in §

37-2-17.1

, public notice of the invitation for bids shall be given a sufficient time prior to the date set forth therein for the opening of bids. Public notice may include publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the state as determined by the purchasing agent not less than seven (7) days nor more than twenty-eight (28) days before the date set for the opening of the bids. The purchasing agent may make a written determination that the twenty-eight (28) day limitation needs to be waived. The written determination shall state the reason why the twenty-eight (28) day limitation is being waived and shall state the number of days, giving a minimum and maximum, before the date set for the opening of bids when public notice is to be given.

Bids shall be opened and read aloud publicly at the time and place designated in the invitation for bids. Each bid, together with the name of the bidder, shall be recorded and an abstract made available for public inspection.

The chief purchasing officer shall adopt and file regulations governing the bidding of highway and bridge construction projects in the state not later than December 31, 2011.

Immediately subsequent to the opening of the bids, the copies of bid documents submitted pursuant to subsection

37-2-18(b)

shall be made available for inspection by the public. Any objection to any bid on the grounds that it is nonresponsive to the invitation for bids must be filed with the purchasing agent within five (5) business days of the opening of the bids. The purchasing agent shall issue a written determination as to whether the subject bid is nonresponsive addressing each assertion in the objection and shall provide a copy of the determination to the objector and all those who submitted bids at least seven (7) business days prior to the award of the contract. If a bid is nonresponsive to the requirements in the invitation to bid, the bid is invalid and the purchasing agent shall reject the bid. The purchasing agent shall have no discretion to waive any requirements in the invitation to bid which are identified as mandatory. Nothing in this section shall be construed to interfere with or invalidate the results of the due diligence conducted by the division of purchasing to determine whether bids are responsive and responsible.

Subsequent to the awarding of the bid, all documents pertinent to the awarding of the bid that were not made public pursuant to subsection

37-2-18(e)

shall be made available and open to public inspection, pursuant to chapter 38-2, the Access to Public Records Act, and retained in the bid file. The copy of the bid proposal provided pursuant to subsection

37-2-18(b)

shall be retained until the bid is awarded.

The contract shall be awarded with reasonable promptness by written notice to the responsive and responsible bidder whose bid is either the lowest bid price, lowest evaluated, or responsive bid price.

Correction or withdrawal of bids may be allowed only to the extent permitted by regulations issued by the chief purchasing officer.

As of January 1, 2011, this section shall apply to contracts greater than one million dollars ($1,000,000); on January 1, 2012 for all contracts greater than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000); on January 1, 2013 for all contracts greater than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000); and on January 1, 2014 for all contracts awarded pursuant to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 137, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 367, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 296, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 221, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 384, § 1.